North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 29A. Trial Court Administrators.

§ 7A-355.
Trial court administrators.

The following districts or sets of districts as defined in G.S. 7A-41.1(a) shall have trial court administrators: Set of districts 10A, 10B, 10C, 10D; District 22 and District 28, and such other districts or sets of districts as may be designated by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

1979, c. 1072, s. 10; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 27.

§ 7A-356.
Duties.

The duties of each trial court administrator shall be to assist in managing civil dockets, to improve jury utilization and to perform such duties as may be assigned by the senior resident superior court judge of his district or set of districts as defined in G.S. 7A-41.1(a) or by other judges designated by that senior resident superior court judge.

History.

1979, c. 1072, s. 10; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 28.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).

§§ 7A-357 through 7A-374.

Reserved for future codification purposes.